Utah statutes.
70A-2-707.   "Person in the position of a seller."



(1)  A "person in the position of a seller" includes as against a principal an agent who has paid or become responsible for the price of goods on behalf of his principal or anyone who otherwise holds a security interest or other right in goods similar to that of a seller.

(2)  A person in the position of a seller may as provided in this chapter withhold or stop delivery (Section 70A-2-705) and resell (Section 70A-2-706) and recover incidental damages (Section 70A-2-710).

